Hawaii statutes.
§490:11-105 Transition provision on change
of place of filing. (1) A financing statement or continuation statement
filed prior to July 1, 1979 which shall not have lapsed prior to July 1, 1979
shall remain effective for the period provided in the old U.C.C., but not less
than five years after the filing.

(2) With respect to any collateral acquired by
the debtor subsequent to the effective date of July 1, 1979, any effective
financing statement or continuation statement described in this section shall apply
only if the filing or filings are in the office or offices that would be
appropriate to perfect the security interests in the new collateral under the
new U.C.C.

(3) The effectiveness of any financing
statement or continuation statement filed prior to July 1, 1979 may be
continued by a continuation statement as permitted by the new U.C.C., except
that if the new U.C.C. requires a filing in an office where there was no
previous financing statement, a new financing statement conforming to section
490:11-106 shall be filed in that office.

(4) If the record of a mortgage of real estate
would have been effective as a fixture filing of goods described therein if the
new U.C.C. had been in effect on the date of recording the mortgage, the
mortgage shall be deemed effective as a fixture filing as to such goods under
section 490:9-408 of the new U.C.C. on the effective date of July 1, 1979. [L
1978, c 155, pt of §1(34); am L 1980, c 232, §25]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next